Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. Certificates of Public Convenience and Necessity; Rates; Service.
§ 77-3-90.
Annual reports of commission.

It shall be the duty of the commission to make and publish annual reports to the governor and the legislature as provided in Section 27-101-1, et seq., of commission activities, including copies of its general orders and regulations, comparative statistical data on the operation of the various public utilities in the state, comparison of rates in Mississippi with rates elsewhere, a detailed report of its investigative division, a detailed report of the public utilities staff, a review of significant developments in the fields of utility law, economics and planning, a report of pending matters before the commission and a digest of the principal decisions of the commission and the Mississippi courts affecting public utilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1983).

§ 77-3-91.
Definitions applicable to §§ 77-3-91 through 77-3-95.

The following terms when used in Sections 77-3-91 through 77-3-95 shall have the following meaning:

“Utility” means an entity as defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i), Mississippi Code of 1972, and whose rates for retail electric service are subject to regulation in this state.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Public Service Commission.

“Return” means before-tax return on common equity capital of the utility.

“Non-utility generator” means an entity selling electric capacity or energy at wholesale and which is not itself a utility as defined in paragraph (a) of this section. Non-utility generator shall not include any entity that is making the sale to the purchasing utility pursuant to a holding company system pooling agreement or a wholesale power sales agreement between or among affiliates where the allocation of power is mandated by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

“Non-associated source” means an entity which is not an affiliate or a subsidiary of the utility.

“Capacity” means that portion of a wholesale purchase which represents the availability of the generating unit to produce the energy to be transmitted to the purchasing utility.

“Energy” means the electricity, as opposed to the availability, received by the purchasing utility pursuant to the sale.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1994).

§ 77-3-93.
Cost of purchasing electricity from non-utility generator for period in excess of 30 days included as expense item for purpose of calculating rates.

Whenever a utility purchases at wholesale from a non-utility generator or some non-associated source all or a portion of its electric capacity and/or energy requirements for a period in excess of thirty (30) days, such utility shall be entitled to include as expense items in its revenue requirements, for the purpose of the calculation of its rates for retail service, the cost of such capacity and energy so purchased, and in addition to such cost, an amount representing a return on the capacity purchased over the period of the test year which is being used to calculate the revenue requirements. This amount shall be calculated using the return allowed by the commission as provided in Section 77-3-95.

Nothing in Sections 77-3-91 through 77-3-95 shall be interpreted to allow a return on the energy purchased by a utility pursuant to its obligation to purchase energy under the federal Public Utilities Regulatory Policy Act of 1978.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 316, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1994).

§ 77-3-95.
Utilities to report to public utility staff and public service commission purchases of electricity from non-utility generator for period in excess of 30 days; public comment on report; hearings.

Before a utility may receive the return on the cost of such capacity purchase, the utility shall report the purchase to the Public Utilities Staff and the Public Service Commission. The utility shall also send notice of the purchase to persons who have requested same and are on the list maintained for that purpose by the Secretary of the Public Service Commission. The Public Utilities Staff shall investigate the purchase to determine:

Whether the purchase is in the best interest of the utility and of the retail customers of the utility;

Whether the portion of the purchase designated as capacity or energy requirements, or both, is appropriate; and

Whether the return filed by the utility in the report of purchase is just and reasonable to the utility and to the retail customers of the utility.

Any third person may comment as deemed appropriate on the report, but if any third person desires a hearing, a written petition must be filed along with all supporting documentation, including all proposed testimony and exhibits supporting the contention that a hearing is needed and supporting the issues that should be considered. These issues may include any of the matters set forth in this section. The Public Utilities Staff shall fully review the information contained in the utility’s report and the material submitted by the third party and shall report in writing to the commission.

If upon recommendation of the Public Utilities Staff or at the request of the third party petitioner, or on its own initiative, the commission determines that a hearing should be held, then the commission will set a time for a hearing, determine the issues to be heard and set a schedule for such preliminary matters as it deems necessary for such hearing. If the commission determines that a hearing is not necessary on any or all of the issues set forth in this section, it may determine such issue or issues based upon the record before it and file its final order thereon which shall then be subject to appeal as provided in Sections 77-3-67 through 77-3-73.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 316, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1994).

§ 77-3-97.
Water conservation; submetering in multiunit dwellings.

The Legislature finds that the conservation of water resources is vitally important to the future of our state, and that in order to enhance the conservation of water resources, it is necessary to grant specific authority for the provision of submetering of water and wastewater disposal service.

As used in this section, the following words and phrases have the meanings ascribed in this subsection, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Apartment house” means one or more buildings containing four (4) or more dwelling units that are occupied primarily for nontransient use, including a residential condominium whether rented or owner occupied, and if a dwelling unit is rented, having rental paid at intervals of one (1) month or longer.

“Dwelling unit” means one or more rooms in an apartment house or condominium, suitable for occupancy as a residence, and containing kitchen and bathroom facilities, or a manufactured home in a manufactured home community.

“Customer” means the individual, firm or corporation in whose name a master meter has been connected by a public utility.

“Owner” means the legal titleholder of an apartment house or manufactured home community and any individual, firm or corporation that purports to be the landlord of tenants in the apartment house or manufactured home community.

“Tenant” means a person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others and who is obligated to pay for the occupancy under a written or oral rental agreement.

“Manufactured home community” means a property on which spaces are rented for the occupancy of: (i) manufactured homes for nontransient residential use and for which rental is paid at intervals of one (1) month or longer; or (ii) recreational vehicles for nontransient residential use for a time period of three (3) months or longer.

“Submetering” means the use of a metering device by a customer who receives water and wastewater service from a public utility, which metering device measures water supplied to a tenant for the purpose of the customer’s charging the tenant of a dwelling unit separately for water and wastewater usage.

An apartment house owner, manufactured home community owner or condominium manager may provide for submetering of each dwelling unit or rental unit for the measurement of the quantity of water consumed by the occupants of the unit. If submetering is utilized, tenants may be charged separately for water and wastewater services on a pass through allocated basis for charges incurred by the customer. The charges for a tenant may not exceed the tenant’s pro rata share of all water and wastewater services used by all of the tenants in that apartment house, manufactured home community or condominium.

Any apartment house owner, manufactured home community owner or condominium manager utilizing submetering pursuant to this section shall disclose the submetering to each tenant and obtain from the tenant an acknowledgment of the submetering in a written document.

Submeters installed pursuant to this section must meet the American Water Works Association standards for accuracy.

In rendering charges to tenants pursuant to this section, the customer shall provide:

Beginning and ending meter reads;

A statement that the bill is not from the public utility; and

A telephone number for tenant inquiries on the bill.

Water and wastewater services utilized by the tenant may not be disconnected for nonpayment of submetered bills.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 513, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.